apertium-hbs-eng.eng.dix
    <pardef n="everyone__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL">      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="something__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="th/is__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ese</l>        <r>is<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="th/at__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l>at</l>        <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ose</l>        <r>at<s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="both__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="all__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="the_other__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="what__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="which_one__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="how_many__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="how_much__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="whose__prn">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="what__rel">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
	<pardef n="which__rel">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="those_who__rel">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="that__rel">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="where__rel">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="'s__gen">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="sfx"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="hello__ij">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="east__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="/pants__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l>pants</l>        <r>pants<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>pairs<b/>of<b/>pants</l><r>pants<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="personnel__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="Dutch__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="drachma__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>e</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>i</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="house__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="access__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bab/y__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l>y</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ies</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ys</l>        <r>y<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="analys/is__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l>is</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>es</l>        <r>is<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="maxim/um__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>a</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ums</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="mon/ey__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l>ey</l>        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eys</l>        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ies</l>        <r>ey<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="m/an__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l>an</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>en</l>        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bass__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="bus__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>es</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ses</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="politics__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="wol/f__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l>f</l>        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ves</l>        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>fs</l>        <r>f<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="li/fe__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l>fe</l>        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>ves</l>        <r>fe<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="p/erson__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l>erson</l>        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l>eople</l>        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>ersons</l>        <r>erson<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="staff__n">
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>      <p>        <l></l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p>        <l>s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="Histri"><i>Histri</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antenna"><i>antenna</i><par n="drachma__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jolly person"><i>jolly<b/>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oof"><i>oof</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="crunch"><i>crunch</i><par n="hello__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="that"><i>th</i><par n="th/at__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="whose"><i>whose</i><par n="whose__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="whose"><i>whose</i><par n="that__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="listening"><i>listening</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
    <e lm="swim"><i>swim</i><par n="east__n"/></e>
    <e lm="school bus"><i>school<b/>bus</i><par n="bus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bacteria"><i>bacteria</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faeces"><i>faeces</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foreman"><i>forem</i><par n="m/an__n"/></e>
    <e lm="housewife"><i>housewi</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ear of corn"><i>ear</i><par n="house__n"/><p><l><b/>of<b/>corn</l><r><g><b/>of<b/>corn</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="pants"><i></i><par n="/pants__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sandbox"><i>sandbox</i><par n="bass__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scarf"><i>scar</i><par n="wol/f__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dutch"><par n="Dd"/><i>utch</i><par n="Dutch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aesthetics"><i>aesthetics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ordinary person"><i>ordinary<b/>p</i><par n="p/erson__n"/></e>
    <e lm="box of cards"><i>box</i><par n="bass__n"/><p><l><b/>of<b/>cards</l><r><g><b/>of<b/>cards</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="bus"><i>bus</i><par n="bus__n"/></e>
    <e lm="clemency"><i>clemenc</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="coitus"><i>coitus</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mass medium"><i>mass<b/>medi</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rostrum"><i>rostr</i><par n="maxim/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="editorial staff"><i>editorial<b/>staff</i><par n="staff__n"/></e>
    <e lm="emphasis"><i>emphas</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fame"><i>fame</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="life"><i>li</i><par n="li/fe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="woods"><i>woods</i><par n="personnel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="opportunity"><i>opportunit</i><par n="bab/y__n"/></e>
    <e lm="status quo"><i>status<b/>quo</i><par n="access__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tactics"><i>tactics</i><par n="politics__n"/></e>
    <e lm="thesis"><i>thes</i><par n="analys/is__n"/></e>
    <e lm="money"><i>mon</i><par n="mon/ey__n"/></e>
   <e lm="chairman"><i>chairm</i><par n="m/an__n"/>    </e>
   <e lm="wolf"><i>wol</i><par n="wol/f__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="how big"><i>how<b/>big</i><par n="what__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="much"><i>much</i><par n="all__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="anyone"><i>anyone</i><par n="everyone__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="either"><i>either</i><par n="all__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="everyone"><i>everyone</i><par n="everyone__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="few"><i>few</i><par n="both__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="how many"><i>how<b/>many</i><par n="how_many__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="how much"><i>how<b/>much</i><par n="how_much__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="none"><i>none</i><par n="something__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="one"><i>one</i><par n="the_other__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="some"><i>some</i><par n="both__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="something"><i>something</i><par n="something__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="this"><i>th</i><par n="th/is__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="that"><i>th</i><par n="th/at__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="which"><i>which</i><par n="what__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="which one"><i>which<b/>one</i><par n="which_one__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="the one who"><i>the<b/>one<b/>who</i><par n="what__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="the one which"><i>the<b/>one<b/>which</i><par n="what__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="the ones that"><i>the<b/>ones<b/>that</i><par n="those_who__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="those who"><i>those<b/>who</i><par n="those_who__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="the one"><i>the<b/>one</i><par n="the_other__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="where"><i>where</i><par n="where__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="which"><i>which</i><par n="that__rel"/></e>
    <e r="RL"><i>which</i><par n="which__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="of which"><p><l>of<b/>which</l><r>of<s n="pr"/><j/>which</r></p><par n="which__rel"/></e>
    <e><i>'s</i><par n="'s__gen"/></e>
